Arkansas, session 2025, HB1678.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-16-1506(a), concerning the criminal
penalties under the Abortion-Inducing Drugs Safety Act, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) A person who intentionally, knowingly, or recklessly violates a
provision of this subchapter is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor Class D
felony.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 20-16-1506, concerning criminal penalties
for a violation of the Abortion-Inducing Drugs Safety Act, is amended to add
an additional subsection to read as follows:
(c) A licensed healthcare provider, pharmacist, or other individual or
entity that prescribes, authorizes, or approves the sale or delivery of
abortion-inducing drugs in violation of this subchapter is guilty of a Class
D felony and shall be fined fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) per violation.
*JMB223*
04-14-2025 09:25:36 JMB223

As Engrossed: H4/14/25 HB1678

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 20-16-1507 is amended to read as follows:
20-16-1507. Civil remedies and professional sanctions.
(a) In addition to whatever remedies are available under the common or
statutory law of this state, failure to comply with the requirements of this
subchapter shall provide a basis for:
(1) A civil malpractice action for actual and punitive damages;
(2) A professional disciplinary action under § 16-114-201 et
seq.; and
(3) Recovery for the woman's survivors for the wrongful death of
the woman under § 16-62-102.
(b) A woman upon whom a drug-induced abortion has been performed or
attempted in violation of this subchapter or the father of the unborn child
who was the subject of the drug-induced abortion performed or attempted in
violation of this subchapter may bring an action for actual and punitive
damages against the person or entity that purposely, knowingly, or recklessly
violates this subchapter.
(c) A cause of action against a person or entity that has purposely,
knowingly, or recklessly violated this subchapter may be maintained by:
(A) The woman upon whom a drug-induced abortion was
performed or induced or attempted to be performed or induced;
(B) The father of the unborn child who was the subject of
the drug-induced abortion or attempted drug-induced abortion;
(C) A person who is the spouse, parent, or guardian of the
woman upon whom a drug-induced abortion has been performed or induced or
attempted to be performed or induced;
(D) A prosecuting attorney with appropriate jurisdiction;
(E) The Attorney General; or
(F) Any resident of this state that receives a shipment of
abortion-inducing drugs for illegal purposes.
(d) Damages shall not be awarded to a plaintiff if the pregnancy
resulted from the plaintiff's criminal conduct.
(e) A violation of this subchapter is a deceptive and unconscionable
trade practice under the Deceptive Trade Practices Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.,
and is subject to the enforcement provisions of the Deceptive Trade Practices
Act, § 4-88-101 et seq.
04-14-2025 09:25:36 JMB223

As Engrossed: H4/14/25 HB1678
(f) A civil liability may not be assessed against the pregnant woman
upon whom the drug-induced abortion is performed.
(e)(g) When requested, the court shall allow a woman to proceed using
solely her initials or a pseudonym and may close any proceedings in the case
and enter other protective orders to preserve the privacy of the woman upon
whom the drug-induced abortion was performed.
(d)(h) If judgment is rendered in favor of the plaintiff, the court
shall also render judgment for a reasonable attorney's fee in favor of the
plaintiff against the defendant.
(e)(i) If judgment is rendered in favor of the defendant and the court
finds that the plaintiff's suit was frivolous and brought in bad faith, the
court shall also render judgment for a reasonable attorney's fee in favor of
the defendant against the plaintiff.
(f)(j) Upon a finding of the Arkansas State Medical Board that a
physician failed to comply with the requirements of this subchapter, the
board shall revoke the physician's medical license.

/s/Long


















04-14-2025 09:25:36 JMB223